California statutes. Financial Code
Savings accounts may be opened for cash or, subject to any limitations or restrictions in regulations issued by the commissioner, for property in which the association is authorized to invest. In the absence of fraud in the transaction, the value of the property taken in payment, as determined by the board of directors, shall be conclusive.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6603.

No member of a mutual association is responsible for any losses of the association, no savings account is subject to assessment, and no savings account holder is liable for any unpaid installments on the account.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Savings Accounts [6651. - 6663.]

6651.

Except for savings accounts issued in marketable or bearer form, savings accounts shall be represented only by the account of each savings account holder on the books of the association, and the accounts or any interest in the accounts shall be transferable only on the books of the association and upon proper written application, and acceptance by the association of the transferee as a holder upon terms approved by the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6652.

(a) Upon the filing with an association by the savings account holder of record as shown by the books of the association, or by the holder’s legal representative, of an affidavit to the effect that the evidence of account, if any, has been lost or destroyed, and that the account has not been pledged or assigned in whole or in part, the association shall issue a new evidence of account, if applicable, in the name of the holder of record.

(b) The new evidence of account may state that it is issued in lieu of the one lost or destroyed and that
 the association shall not be liable for the loss or destruction of the original evidence of account.

(c) The association may require an indemnification or a bond in an amount it deems sufficient to indemnify the association against any loss which might result from the issuance of a new evidence of account under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 287, Sec. 19.   Effective July 6, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

6653.

(a) No association shall, directly or indirectly, for the opening or increasing of any savings account, give, sell, dispose of, or permit the giving, selling, or disposition of, for any one opening or increase anything having a cost or value in excess of the amount authorized by the commissioner by regulation. 

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) the commissioner is authorized to impose by regulation restrictions on associations, relating to the distribution and advertising of giveaways, equivalent to those imposed on federal associations doing business in this
 state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6653.5.

(a) A troubled savings association may not accept funds obtained, directly or indirectly, by or through any deposit broker for deposit into one or more accounts.

(b) Any renewal of a savings account in any troubled savings association and any rollover of any amount on deposit in such a savings account shall be treated as an acceptance of funds by the troubled savings association for purposes of subdivision (a).

(c) The commissioner may, on a case-by-case basis and upon application by a savings
 association, waive the applicability of subdivision (a) upon a finding that the acceptance of these deposits does not constitute an unsafe or unsound practice with respect to that savings association.

(d) The commissioner may impose, by regulation or order, such additional restrictions on the acceptance of broker deposits by any troubled savings association as the commissioner may determine to be appropriate.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Deposit broker,” except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2), means either of the following:

(A) Any person engaged in (i) the business of placing deposits, or facilitating the placement of deposits, of third parties with financial institutions or (ii) the business of placing deposits with financial
 institutions for the purpose of selling interests in those deposits to third parties.

(B) An agent or trustee who establishes a savings account to facilitate a business arrangement with a financial institution to use the proceeds of the account to fund a prearranged loan.

(2) Subject to paragraph (3), “deposit broker” does not include any of the following:

(A) A savings association with respect to funds placed with that savings association.

(B) An employee of a savings association with respect to funds placed with the employing savings association.

(C) A trust department of a savings association, if the trust in question has not been established for the primary purpose of placing funds
 with financial institutions.

(D) The trustee of a pension or other employee benefit plan, with respect to funds of the plan.

(E) A person acting as a plan administrator or an investment adviser in connection with a pension plan or other employee benefit plan, provided that that person is performing managerial functions with respect to the plan.

(F) The trustee of a testamentary account.

(G) The trustee of an irrevocable trust (other than one described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), as long as the trust in question has not been established for the primary purpose of placing funds with financial institutions.

(H) A trustee or custodian of a pension or profitsharing plan qualified
 under Section 401(d) or 403(a) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

(I) An agent or nominee whose primary purpose is not the placement of funds with financial institutions.

(3) The exceptions specified in paragraph (2) do not apply to, and the term “deposit broker” includes, any savings association, and any employee of any savings association, that engages, directly or indirectly, in the solicitation of deposits by offering rates of interest (with respect to those deposits) which are significantly higher than the prevailing rates of interest on deposits offered by other associations and federal associations in the savings association’s normal market area.

(4) “Employee” means any person meeting all of the following criteria:

(A) The person is
 employed exclusively by the savings association.

(B) The person’s compensation is primarily in the form of a salary.

(C) The person does not share that compensation with a deposit broker.

(D) The person’s office space or place of business is used exclusively for the benefit of the savings association which employs the person.

(5) “Troubled savings association” means any savings association which does not meet the minimum capital requirements applicable with respect to that savings association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

6660.

(a) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Account” means withdrawable or repurchasable shares, investment certificates, deposits, or savings accounts as defined in Section 561.2, 561.16, 561.28, 561.29, 561.42, or 563.6 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations pursuant to which the account holder from time to time may make deposits and effect withdrawals.

(2) “Account holder” means a person who is
 identified on the signature card for an account, or in the absence of a signature card, a person who has an interest in an account which is reflected on the records of the association for that account to whom statements of account or other notices are normally given, or the agent of such person.

(3) “Charges” means those charges which an association may, from time to time, impose on an account in the normal course of business in the operation of the account and, does not include:

(A) Charges which may be imposed for extraordinary services furnished at the specific request of the account holder.

(B) Charges or amounts required to be disclosed to the depositor pursuant to the Truth-in-Lending Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.) and Regulation Z (12 C.F.R. 226.1 et seq.), as amended.

(4) “Customer” means one or more natural persons.

(5) “Debt” means an interest-bearing obligation or an obligation that by its terms is payable in installments, which has not been reduced to judgment, arising from an extension of credit to a natural person primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, and does not mean a charge for savings and loan services, for a debit for uncollected funds, for dishonored checks cashed for a customer, or for an overdraft account imposed by an association on a savings account.

(b) An association is limited in exercising any setoff for a debt claimed to be owed to the association by a customer in that a setoff shall not result in an aggregate balance of less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) as shown on the records of the association for all accounts maintained by a customer
 with the association or any of its branches.

(c) Not later than the day following the exercise of any setoff with respect to an account for any debt claimed to be owed to the association by a customer, the association shall deliver to each customer personally or send by first-class mail postage prepaid to the address of each customer as shown on the records of the association a written notice in at least 10-point type containing the following:

(1) A statement that the association has set off all or part of a debt against the customer’s account, identifying the account, and giving the respective balances before and after the setoff.

(2) A statement identifying the debt setoff against the account and giving the respective balances due before and after the setoff.

(3) A statement that if the customer claims that the debt has been paid or is not now owing, or that the funds in the account consist of moneys expressly exempt pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and listed in the notice, the customer may execute and return the notice to the association by mail at the address shown or personally to the branch where the customer’s account is maintained not later than 20 days after the date of mailing or personal delivery.

(4) A statement that (A) if the notice is executed and returned, the association may file an action in court to collect the debt, (B) that if a lawsuit is filed, the customer will be notified and have an opportunity to appear and defend, and (C) that if the association is successful, the customer will be liable for court costs, and attorney’s fees, if the debt so provides.

(5) A response form in at least 10-point type containing substantially the following:“The debt described in the Notice of Setoff received from the savings and loan association is__ isnot__ my debt or the debt of another person in whose name the account is maintained.“I claim that the debt:has been paid.is not now owing.is not subject to setoff because the money in the account is:Paid earnings (CCP 704.070)Proceeds from execution sale of or insurance for loss of a motor vehicle (CCP 704.010)Proceeds from execution sale of household furnishings or other personal effects (CCP 704.020)Relocation benefits (CCP704.180)Life insurance proceeds (CCP 704.100)Disability and health insurance benefits (CCP 704.130)Workers’ compensation benefits (CCP 704.160)Unemployment or strike benefits (CCP 704.120)Retirement benefits including, but not limited to, social security benefits (CCP 704.080, 704.110, 704.115)Public assistance benefits including welfare payments and supplemental security income (SSI) or charitable aid (CCP 704.170)Proceeds from sale of or insurance for damage or destruction of a dwelling (CCP 704.720, 704.960)Proceeds from execution sale of or insurance for loss of tools of a trade (CCP
 704.060)Award of damages for personal injury (CCP 704.140) or wrongful death (CCP 704.150)Financial aid paid by an institution of higher education to a student for expenses while attending school (CCP 704.190)
I declare under penalty of perjury that the foregoing is true and
 correct.Executed at City or County, California on DateSigned: ”(d) If the response form described in subdivision (c) executed by the customer is received by the association not later than 20 days after the date of mailing or personal delivery of the written notice, the amount of the setoff for any debt claimed to be owed to the association by a customer, and any service charges resulting from the setoff,
 shall be reversed and shall be credited to the customer’s account not later than the end of the third business day following receipt of the executed response form.

(e) The limitations provided in this section do not apply to accounts in which the association has a security interest expressed by a written contract as collateral for the debt owing to the association by the customer.

(f) The limitations provided in this section do not apply when a customer previously has authorized an association in writing to periodically debit an account as the agreed method of payment of the debt.

(g) The limitations provided in this section shall apply only to the exercise by an association of a setoff with respect to debts claimed to be owing to it by customers on or after July 1, 1976.

(h) Nothing in this section shall prejudice a person’s right to assert exemptions under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or to assert a claim or defense as to the validity of the debt, in a judicial proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 68, Sec. 8.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6661.

Notice to an association or federal association of an adverse claim to a savings account of, or to personal property held for the account of, any person shall be disregarded, and the association or federal association, notwithstanding the notice, shall honor withdrawal applications and shall pay withdrawals and interest to the person or persons to whose credit the account stands or shall deliver the property to or upon the order of the person for whose account the property is held, without any liability on the part of the association or federal association; subject, however, to the exceptions provided in subdivisions (a) and (b):

(a) If an adverse claimant delivers to the association or federal association at the office at which the account is carried or the property held an affidavit of the claimant stating that of the claimant’s own knowledge the person to whose credit the deposit stands or for whose account the property is held is a fiduciary for the adverse claimant and that the claimant has reason to believe the fiduciary is about to misappropriate the account or the property, and stating the facts upon which the claim of fiduciary relationship and the belief are founded, the association or federal association shall refuse to pay withdrawals or interest on the account and shall refuse to deliver the property for a period of not more than three court days (including the day of delivery) from the date that the association or federal association received the adverse claimant’s affidavit, without liability on its part and without liability for the sufficiency or truth of
 the facts alleged in the affidavit.

(b) If at any time, either before, after, or in the absence of the filing of an affidavit by the adverse claimant, the adverse claimant procures and serves upon the association or federal association at the office at which the account is carried or the property held a restraining order, injunction, or other appropriate order against the association or federal association from a court of competent jurisdiction in an action in which the adverse claimant and all persons in whose names the account stands or for whose account the property is held are the parties, the association or federal association shall comply with the order or injunction, without liability on its part.

(c) The provisions of this section shall be applicable even though the name of the person appearing on the books to whose credit the account stands or for whose account the
 property is held is modified by a qualifying or descriptive term such as “agent,” “trustee,” or other word or phrase indicating that the person may hold the account or property in a fiduciary capacity.

(d) Nothing in the California Multiple-Party Accounts Law contained in Part 2 (commencing with Section 5100) of Division 5 of the Probate Code limits the applicability of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79, Sec. 5.   Operative July 1, 1991, pursuant to Stats. 1990, Ch. 710, Sec. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

6662.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit an association or federal association from issuing tenancy in common, community property, and other types of savings accounts authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 958, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

6663.

If any attachment is levied upon any savings account or any other property maintained with an association or federal association, a copy of the writ and notice of attachment shall be served upon the manager or any other officer of the association or federal association. Service shall be made at the office or branch at which the savings account or other property is maintained, if the office or branch is in operation at the time of the service or, if the office, agency, or branch is not in operation at the time of service, at the home office of the association or federal association. Writs and notices of attachment which are not
 so served are not effective as to any savings account or other property maintained with the association or federal association, irrespective of any other provision of law relating to service of attachments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 983, Sec. 10.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Contracts for Savings Programs [6700. - 6702.]

6700.

An association may contract with the proper authorities of any public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school or institution of higher learning, or any public or charitable institution caring for minors, for the participation and implementation by the association in any school or institutional thrift or savings plan, and it may accept savings accounts at the school or institution, either by its own collector or by any representative of the school or institution that becomes the agent of the association for that purpose.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6701.

An association may contract with any employer, as follows:

(a) With respect to the solicitation, collection, and receipt of savings by payroll deduction to be credited to a designated account or accounts of its employees who voluntarily elect to participate.

(b) With respect to the direct deposit of wages or salary paid to the account of the employee by electronic or other medium upon authorization in writing by the employee and designation of the association as the recipient of the deposits.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6702.

An association may pay commissions or fees in cash or merchandise for soliciting deposits to any employee of the association or to any broker or agent as determined by the association.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers of Attorney on Savings Accounts [6725. - 6725.]

6725.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an association or federal association may continue to recognize the authority of an attorney-in-fact authorized in writing to manage or to make withdrawals either in whole or in part from the savings account of a holder, whether minor or adult, until it receives written notice or is on actual notice of the revocation of authority, whether the revocation is express or by operation of law.

(b) Except as provided in Division 4.5
 (commencing with Section 4000) of the Probate Code, written notice of the death or adjudication of incompetency of the account holder that is delivered to the office where the account is maintained shall constitute written notice of revocation of the authority of the attorney-in-fact.

(c) No association or federal association shall be liable for damages, penalty, or tax by reason of any payment made pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Married Persons and Minors [6750. - 6752.]

6750.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this article, an association or federal association may issue savings accounts to any married person or minor as the sole and absolute owner of the account, and receive payments by or for the owner, and pay withdrawals, accept pledges to the association, and act in any other manner with respect to the accounts on the order of a married person or minor. A married person or minor may establish a trust under Sections 401 and 408 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and an association or federal association may issue savings accounts to the trust.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 37.5.)
-------------------------------------------

6751.

Any payment or delivery of rights to a married person, to any minor, or to a trust established by or for a married person, or a minor, or a receipt or acquittance signed by a married person or by a minor who holds a savings account, shall be a sufficient release of the association or federal association for any payment made or delivery of rights to the married person or minor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6752.

(a) In the case of a minor, the receipt, acquittance, pledge, or other action required by the association or federal association to be taken by the minor shall be binding upon the minor with like effect as if the minor were of full age and legal capacity.

(b) Except under subdivision (c), the parent or guardian of the minor shall not have the power to attach or transfer any savings account issued to or in the name of the minor, provided that a parent or guardian of a minor aged 13 or less may require, by written notice delivered to the office where the account is
 maintained, that the signatures of both the minor and the parent or guardian be required for withdrawals from the account.

(c) In the event of the death of a minor the receipt or acquittance of either parent, guardian, or foster parent of the minor is a sufficient discharge of the association or federal association for any sums not exceeding in the aggregate two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) unless the minor has given written notice to the association or federal association to accept the signature of the parent, guardian or foster parent to withdraw a greater amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 958, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Multiple-Party Accounts [6800. - 6805.]

6800.

An account in an association or federal association that is a multiple-party account as defined in Section 5132 of the Probate Code is governed by Part 2 (commencing with Section 5100) of Division 5 of the Probate Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79, Sec. 6.   Operative July 1, 1991, pursuant to Stats. 1990, Ch. 710, Sec. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

6804.

No association or federal association paying any survivor in accordance with Part 2 (commencing with Section 5100) of Division 5 of the Probate Code shall, because of the payment, be liable for any estate, inheritance, or succession taxes that may be due this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79, Sec. 7.   Operative July 1, 1991, pursuant to Stats. 1990, Ch. 710, Sec. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

6805.

The pledge or hypothecation to any association or federal association of all or part of a multiple party account, as defined in Section 5132 of the Probate Code, signed by any one or more tenants, whether minor or adult, upon whose signature or signatures withdrawals may be made from the account shall, unless the terms of the account provide specifically to the contrary, be a valid pledge and transfer to the association or federal association of that part of the account pledged or hypothecated, and shall not operate to sever or terminate all or any part of the account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 397, Sec. 13.5.   Operative July 1, 1990, by Sec. 42 of Ch. 397.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Accounts of Administrators, Executors, Guardians, Custodians, Trustees, and Other Fiduciaries [6850. - 6856.]

6850.

Any association may accept fiduciary savings accounts in the name of any administrator, executor, custodian, conservator, guardian, trustee, or other fiduciary for a named beneficiary or beneficiaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6851.

(a) The withdrawal value of a fiduciary account, and interest on it, or other rights relating to it, may be paid or delivered, in whole or in part, to the fiduciary without regard to any notice to the contrary as long as the fiduciary is living.

(b) The payment or delivery to the fiduciary or a receipt or acquittance signed by a fiduciary to whom payment or delivery of rights is made shall be a sufficient release of an association for the payment or delivery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6852.

(a) Whenever a person holding an account in a fiduciary capacity dies and no written notice of the revocation or termination of the fiduciary relationship has been given to an association and the association has no written notice of any other disposition of the beneficial estate, the withdrawal value of the account, and interest on it, or other rights relating to it, may, at the option of an association, be paid or delivered, in whole or in part, to the beneficiary or beneficiaries.

(b) In the absence of written notice to the contrary an association may presume that each
 beneficiary of an account with two or more beneficiaries has an undivided equal beneficial interest in the account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6855.

No association paying any fiduciary, beneficiary, or designated person in accordance with this article or the California Multiple-Party Accounts Law contained in Part 2 (commencing with Section 5100) of Division 5 of the Probate Code shall, because of the payment, be liable for any estate, inheritance, or succession taxes that may be due this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79, Sec. 8.   Operative July 1, 1991, pursuant to Stats. 1990, Ch. 710, Sec. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

6856.

The provisions of this article apply to federal associations to the extent that they are not inconsistent with and do not infringe upon federal laws governing federal associations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Accounts of Incompetents [6900. - 6900.]

6900.

If an association or federal association has received no written notice and is not on actual notice that the savings account holder has been adjudicated incompetent, it may pay or deliver funds to the account holder in accordance with the provisions of the savings account contract, and the receipt or acquittance of the holder shall be a sufficient release of that association or federal association for the payment or delivery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 958, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Accounts of Deceased Nonresidents [6950. - 6951.]

6950.

(a) When a savings account is held in any association or federal association by a person who dies while domiciled in a sister state or foreign nation, the account, together with additions and interest, or any part of it, shall be exempt from any taxation otherwise imposed by this state.

(b) When a savings account is held in any association or federal association by a person who dies while domiciled in a sister state, the account, together with additions and interest, or any part of it, shall be paid to the sister state personal representative or other claimant under
 the Probate Code, provided the personal representative or other claimant has furnished the association or federal association with all of the documentation required under applicable provisions of the Probate Code and evidence of ownership of the account, if any, issued under Section 6652.

(c) Upon payment or delivery to the personal representative or other claimant after receipt of the documents specified in subdivision (b), the association or federal association is released and discharged to the same extent as if the payment or delivery had been made to a legally qualified local personal representative, and is not required to account for the application or disposition of the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1199, Sec. 14.   Operative July 1, 1989, by Sec. 119 of Ch. 1199.)
-------------------------------------------

6951.

No action at law or in equity shall be maintained against an association or federal association for payment made in accordance with this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 958, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Savings Accounts as Legal Investments and as Security; Public Funds [7000. - 7002.]

7000.

(a) Administrators, executors, custodians, conservators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries, insurance companies, business and manufacturing companies, banks, trust companies, credit unions, and other types of similar financial organizations, charitable, educational, eleemosynary and public corporations, funds and organizations, and municipalities and other public corporations and bodies, and public officials are specifically authorized and empowered to invest funds held by them, without any order of any court, in savings accounts of associations and federal associations and the investments are
 legal investments for those funds.

(b) No association shall have on deposit at any one time funds of the State of California, of the cities, counties, and other political subdivisions of the state, and of the public corporations and districts of the state, that, in the aggregate, exceed in amount 400 percent of its statutory net worth. The amount of funds on deposit secured by surety bonds shall not at any time, in the aggregate, exceed 100 percent of statutory net worth. The limitations of this subdivision as to the amount of funds which may be on deposit at any one time shall not apply to negotiable certificates of deposit.

(c) An association or federal association may act as a depositary or fiscal agent for the holding or handling of public funds notwithstanding the fact that a member of the legislative body or an officer or employee of the depositor is an officer, employee, or
 stockholder of the association or federal association, or of a savings and loan holding company or service corporation of the association or federal association.

(d) Under this section a member of a legislative body, or an officer or employee shall not be deemed “interested in any contract” as that phrase is used in Section 1090 of the Government Code, if that person’s sole interest is the fact that the person is an officer, employee, or stockholder of the association or federal association selected to act as depositary, paying agent, or fiscal agent or of its savings and loan holding company or service corporation.

(e) An officer or employee of a local public agency shall be deemed to have only a “remote interest” in a contract, as that term is used in Section 1091 of the Government Code, where the contract is entered into without competitive bidding under a procedure established
 by law, if the sole interest is that of an officer, director, or employee, of an association or federal association or savings and loan holding company or service corporation of the association or federal association with which a party to the contract has the relationship of borrower or depositor, debtor, or creditor, and if the conditions of subdivision (a) of Section 1091 of the Government Code are met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 983, Sec. 10.5.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

7001.

(a) Whenever, under the laws of this state or otherwise, a deposit of securities is required for any purpose, the savings accounts and accounts made legal investments by this article shall be acceptable deposits.

(b) Whenever, under the laws of this state or otherwise, a bond is required with security, the bond may be furnished, and the savings accounts and accounts made legal investments by this article in the amount of the bond shall be acceptable as security without other security.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7002.

The provisions of this article supplement any and all other laws relating to and declaring what shall be legal investments for the persons, fiduciaries, corporations, organizations’ funds, municipalities, bodies, and officials referred to in this article and supplement the laws relating to the deposit of securities and the making and filing of bonds for any purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Interest [7050. - 7055.]

7050.

An association may issue savings accounts earning interest at different rates of return. The annual rate of return paid on a savings account may either be fixed at the time the account is issued or may vary on any basis specified at the time the account is accepted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7051.

An association may classify its savings accounts on any basis including, but not limited to, character, amount, or duration of the account, regularity of additions, or location of origin of the account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7052.

Except for accounts that are classified according to a specified contractual time or notice period, interest shall be based on the withdrawal value of each savings account at the beginning of the accounting period, plus additions made during the period (less amounts previously withdrawn and noticed for withdrawal, which for interest purposes shall be deducted from the latest previous additions) computed at the rate for the time the funds have been invested, determined as provided in Section 7053.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7053.

(a) The date of investment in a savings account shall be the date of actual receipt by the association of the account or an addition to the account, except that if the association shall so determine, accounts in one or more classifications or additions received by the association on or before a date not later than the 20th day of the month (unless the day determined is not a business day, in which case it may be the next succeeding business day) shall receive interest as if invested on the first day of the month in which the payments were received.

(b) If the association makes a determination under subdivision (a) it also shall determine that payments received subsequent to that determination date shall either receive interest as if invested on the first day of the next succeeding month, or receive interest from the date of actual receipt by the association, except as provided by Section 866.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 983, Sec. 11.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

7054.

The board of directors, by resolution, may determine any of the following:

(a) That interest shall not be paid on designated types of savings accounts from which withdrawals may be made upon demand or by negotiable and transferable order or authorization.

(b) That an association may establish minimum balance requirements for savings accounts to be eligible for distribution of interest.

(c) That, subject to applicable maximum regulatory limitations, an association
 may pay interest on a savings account at a rate or anticipated rate of return determined at the time that the account is accepted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7055.

The directors shall determine the method of calculating the amount of any interest on any savings account classification as provided in this article and the time or times when the interest is to be paid or credited.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Withdrawals [7100. - 7100.]

7100.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, but subject to subdivision (b), an association may permit the owner of a deposit or account to make withdrawals by negotiable or transferable instruments for the purpose of making transfers to third parties.

(b) With respect to deposits or accounts on which interest or dividends are paid, subdivision (a) shall apply only to the deposits or accounts which consist solely of funds in which the entire beneficial interest is held by one or more individuals or by an organization which is operated primarily for religious,
 philanthropic, charitable, educational, political, or other similar purposes and which is not operated for profit.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an association may provide for the automatic transfer of funds services at the direction of an account holder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 718, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Redemption [7150. - 7154.]

7150.

At any time funds are on hand for the purpose, an association shall have the right to redeem by lot or otherwise, as the board of directors may determine, all or any part of any of its savings accounts on an interest date by giving 30 days’ notice by registered mail addressed to each affected account holder at the holder’s last address as recorded on the books of the association.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7151.

Except with the prior consent of the commissioner, no association shall redeem any of its savings accounts when the association is in an impaired condition and when it has applications for withdrawal that have been on file more than 14 days and have not been reached for payment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7152.

The redemption price of savings accounts redeemed shall be the full value of the account redeemed, as determined by the board of directors, but in no event shall the redemption price be less than the withdrawal value.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7153.
